backend/sq_AL_cleaned.aff
SFX D3 Y 100
SFX D3 a e sha po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 a te sha po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 a im sha po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 a it sha po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 a in sha po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 aj hesh aj po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 aj hej aj po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 aj heshin aj po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 e ja e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 e je e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 e nte e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 e nim e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 e nit e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 e nin e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 ej ija ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 ej ije ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 ej inte ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 ej inim ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 ej init ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 ej inin ej po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 ë ija [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 ë ije [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 ë inte [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 ë inim [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 ë init [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 ë inin [lvxz]ë po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 jedh idhja jedh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 jedh idhje jedh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 jedh idhnim jedh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 jedh idhnit jedh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 jeg igjja jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 jeg igjje jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 jeg igjte jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 jeg igjnim jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 jeg igjnit jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 jeg igjnin jeg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 jerdh irdhja jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 jerdh irdhje jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 jerdh irdhte jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 jerdh irdhnim jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 jerdh irdhnit jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 jerdh irdhnin jerdh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 jerg irgjja jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 jerg irgjje jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 jerg irgjte jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 jerg irgjnim jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 jerg irgjnit jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 jerg irgjnin jerg po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 ua oja ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 ua oje ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 ua onte ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 ua onim ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 ua onit ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 ua onin ua po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 arr erresha arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 arr erreshe arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 arr erresh arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 arr errej arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 arr erreshim arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 arr erreshit arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 arr erreshin arr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 er resha er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 er reshe er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 er resh er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 er rej er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 er reshim er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 er reshit er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 er reshin er po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 err irresha qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 err irreshe qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 err irrej qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 err irresh qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 err irreshim qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 err irreshit qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 err irreshin qerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 es itesha [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 es iteshe [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 es itej [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 es itesh [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 es iteshim [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 es iteshit [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 es iteshin [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 esh ishesha esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 esh isheshe esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 esh ishesh esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 esh ishej esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 esh isheshim esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 esh isheshit esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 esh isheshin esh po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D3 ez izesha dez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 ez izeshe dez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 ez izeshim dez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 ez izeshit dez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 ërras irresha ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D3 ërras irreshe ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D3 ërras irresh ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 ërras irrej ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D3 ërras irreshim ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D3 ërras irreshit ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D3 ërras irreshin ërras po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3

SFX D4 Y 81
SFX D4 0 hesha [ai] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 0 heshe [ai] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 0 heshim [ai] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 0 heshit [ai] po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 e ija [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 e ije [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 e inim [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 e inin [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 e init [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 e inte [lr]e po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 0 a j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 0 e j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 j nte j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 j nim j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 j nit j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 j nin j po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 jedh idhte edh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jedh idhnin edh po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 te ja te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 te je te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 te nte te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 te nim te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 te nit te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 te nin te po:verb is:v_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 jek iqesha jek po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 jek iqeshe jek po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 jek iqeshim jek po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 jek iqeshit jek po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 jel ilesha jel po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 jel ileshe jel po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 jel ileshim jel po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 jel ileshit jel po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 jell illesha jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 jell illeshe jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 jell illesh jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jell illej jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jell illeshim jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 jell illeshit jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 jell illeshin jell po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 jep ipesha rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 jep ipeshe rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 jep ipesh rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jep ipej rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jep ipeshim rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 jep ipeshit rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 jep ipeshin rrjep po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 m sha m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 m she m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 m sh m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 m j m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 m shim m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 m shit m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 m shin m po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 as itesha [lr]as po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 as iteshe [lr]as po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 as iteshim [lr]as po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 as iteshit [lr]as po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 as iteshin [lr]as po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 as esha bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 as eshe bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 as esh bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 as ej bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 as eshim bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 as eshit bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 as eshin bas po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 ez izesh ez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 ez izej ez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 ez izeshin ez po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 jerr irresh jerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jerr irrej jerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jerr irreshin jerr po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 jes itesha jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg1
SFX D4 jes iteshe jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg2
SFX D4 jes itesh jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jes itej jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 jes iteshim jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl1
SFX D4 jes iteshit jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl2
SFX D4 jes iteshin jes po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
SFX D4 t sh et po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 t j et po:verb is:j_dfpa is:sg3
SFX D4 t shin et po:verb is:j_dfpa is:pl3
